New York, session 2025-2026, A1621.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 711 of the real property 2 actions and proceedings law, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 305 of 3 the laws of 1963 and subdivision 2 as amended by section 4 of part HH of 4 chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, are amended to read as follows: 5 1. (a) The tenant continues in possession of any portion of the prem- 6 ises after the expiration of [his] such tenant's term, without the 7 permission of the landlord or, in a case where a new lessee is entitled 8 to possession, without the permission of the new lessee, providing that, 9 in all proceedings that are not subject to paragraph (f) of this subdi- 10 vision herein, at the time of commencement of the proceeding, there are 11 no violations of record of any applicable state, city or local codes 12 relating to housing maintenance, safety or housing standards pertaining 13 to the subject premises or in the common areas of the subject building, 14 nor any conditions that otherwise contravene section two hundred thir- 15 ty-five-b of the real property law in the subject premises or in the 16 common areas of the subject building, nor any tenant declaration of 17 housing conditions declaring conditions that contravene section two 18 hundred thirty-five-b of the real property law or that violate any EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04167-02-6 A. 1621--A 2 1 applicable state, city or local codes relating to housing maintenance, 2 safety or housing standards, in the subject premises or in the common 3 areas of the subject building or that are hazardous conditions in any 4 building in the landlord's portfolio subject to paragraph (b) of this 5 subdivision herein, nor any conditions that are hazardous violations of 6 any applicable state, city or local codes relating to housing mainte- 7 nance, safety or housing standards or hazardous violations in any build- 8 ing in the landlord's portfolio. Acceptance of rent after commencement 9 of the special proceeding upon this ground shall not terminate such 10 proceeding nor effect any award of possession to the landlord or to the 11 new lessee, as the case may be. A proceeding seeking to recover 12 possession of real property by reason of the termination of the term 13 fixed in the lease pursuant to a provision contained therein giving the 14 landlord the right to terminate the time fixed for occupancy under such 15 agreement if [he] the landlord deem the tenant objectionable, shall not 16 be maintainable unless the landlord shall by competent evidence estab- 17 lish to the satisfaction of the court that the tenant is objectionable. 18 (b) Where a tenant declaration of housing conditions has been filed 19 with the landlord and the court that is the lawful venue for a special 20 proceeding under this subdivision, or where there exist any violations 21 of record of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to hous- 22 ing maintenance, safety or housing standards in the subject apartment or 23 in the common areas of the subject building or any hazardous violations 24 of record of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to hous- 25 ing maintenance, safety or housing standards in or pertaining to any 26 building in the landlord's portfolio, a landlord may commence a proceed- 27 ing under this subdivision by filing, with the petition and notice of 28 petition prescribed by section seven hundred thirty-one of this article, 29 an affirmation including facts establishing that the landlord has 30 corrected any purported conditions contained in the tenant declaration 31 of housing conditions, or that the conditions specified in the tenant 32 declaration of housing conditions never existed or that any violations 33 were placed erroneously by a state, city, or local agency, or that a 34 state, city or local agency, authority or department erroneously failed 35 to remove such violations after they were corrected. 36 (c) Failure by the landlord to disclose an existing violation of 37 record of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to housing 38 maintenance, safety or housing standards or any condition that otherwise 39 contravenes section two hundred thirty-five-b of the real property law 40 in the subject premises or in the common areas of the subject building, 41 or hazardous conditions or hazardous violations of record of any appli- 42 cable state, city or local codes relating to housing maintenance, safety 43 or housing standards in any building in the landlord's portfolio subject 44 to paragraph (b) of this subdivision herein, or an existing tenant 45 declaration of housing conditions is grounds for dismissal. If the court 46 finds that the allegations in such a landlord affirmation are untrue 47 regarding the correction or nonexistence of conditions in a tenant 48 declaration of housing conditions or regarding a corrected or erroneous- 49 ly recorded violation of any applicable state, city, or local codes 50 related to housing maintenance, safety, or housing standards and condi- 51 tions, this is grounds for dismissal. 52 (d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 53 the following meanings: 54 (i) "Hazardous conditions" shall mean those housing conditions that 55 have a serious effect on the life, health, or safety of the occupants 56 thereof. These conditions may include, but are not strictly limited to, A. 1621--A 3 1 cockroach, bedbug, rat, mouse, or other vermin infestations, mold, lead- 2 based paint, essential utility shut-off (i.e., natural gas, heat, 3 running water, electricity, or adequate sewage disposal facilities), 4 defective emergency exits, leaking or defective water supply plumbing, 5 defective plumbing facility, leaking or collapsed roof, inoperable 6 carbon monoxide detector, or inoperable smoke detector. 7 (ii) "Landlord's portfolio" shall mean the collection of all housing 8 accommodations of which the beneficial owner of the premises at issue in 9 the proceeding is a beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, in whole 10 or in part, jointly or separately, excluding each natural person owner's 11 principal residence. For purposes of this subparagraph, a beneficial 12 owner shall mean a natural person who owns or controls not less than 13 twenty-five percent of the housing accommodation or, if the landlord is 14 an entity, a natural person who exercises substantial control over said 15 entity or owns or controls not less than twenty-five percent of the 16 ownership interests of the entity. 17 (e) A tenant declaration of housing conditions shall be used by 18 tenants and occupants to provide notification at any time that at least 19 one condition that contravenes section two hundred thirty-five-b of the 20 real property law or any applicable state, city or local codes relating 21 to housing maintenance, safety or housing standards exists in the 22 subject premises or in the common areas of the subject building or that 23 at least one hazardous condition exists in any building in the land- 24 lord's portfolio subject to paragraph (b) of this subdivision herein. A 25 tenant or occupant shall file a signed tenant declaration of housing 26 conditions form with the court that is the lawful venue for a proceeding 27 filed pursuant to this article with respect to their dwelling, and shall 28 also provide a copy of the filing to their landlord at the address 29 designated on their multiple dwelling registration. 30 (f) Nothing in subdivision one of this section shall prevent eviction 31 proceedings from being commenced or shall cause eviction proceedings to 32 be stayed if the tenant is persistently and unreasonably engaging in 33 behavior that substantially infringes on the use and enjoyment of other 34 tenants or occupants or that causes a substantial safety hazard to 35 others, provided if an eviction proceeding is pending at the effective 36 date of this provision, but the petitioner has not previously alleged 37 that the tenant persistently and unreasonably engaged in such behavior 38 in said proceeding, the petitioner shall be required to submit a new 39 petition with such allegations and comply with all notice and service 40 requirements pursuant to this article. 41 2. (a) The tenant has defaulted in the payment of rent, pursuant to 42 the agreement under which the premises are held, and a written demand of 43 the rent has been made with at least fourteen days' notice requiring, in 44 the alternative, the payment of the rent, or the possession of the prem- 45 ises, has been served upon the tenant as prescribed in section seven 46 hundred thirty-five of this article, and at the time of commencement of 47 the proceeding there are no violations of record of any applicable 48 state, city or local codes relating to housing maintenance, safety or 49 housing standards pertaining to the subject premises or in the common 50 areas of the subject building, nor any conditions that otherwise contra- 51 vene section two hundred thirty-five-b of the real property law in the 52 subject premises or in the common areas of the subject building, nor any 53 tenant declaration of housing conditions declaring conditions that 54 contravene section two hundred thirty-five-b of the real property law or 55 that violate any applicable state, city or local codes relating to hous- 56 ing maintenance, safety or housing standards, in the subject premises or A. 1621--A 4 1 in the common areas of the subject building or that are hazardous condi- 2 tions in the landlord's portfolio herein subject to paragraph (b) of 3 subdivision one of this section, nor any conditions that are hazardous 4 violations of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to 5 housing maintenance, safety or housing standards or hazardous conditions 6 in any building in the landlord's portfolio. 7 (b) The fourteen-day notice shall append or contain the notice 8 required pursuant to section two hundred thirty-one-c of the real prop- 9 erty law, which shall state the following: (i) if the premises are or 10 are not subject to article six-A of the real property law, the "good 11 cause eviction law", and if the premises are exempt, such notice shall 12 state why the premises are exempt from such law; (ii) if the landlord is 13 not renewing the lease for a unit subject to article six-A of the real 14 property law, the lawful basis for such non-renewal; and (iii) if the 15 landlord is increasing the rent upon an existing lease of a unit subject 16 to article six-A of the real property law above the applicable local 17 rent standard, as defined in subdivision eight of section two hundred 18 eleven of the real property law, the justification for such increase. 19 Any person succeeding to the landlord's interest in the premises may 20 proceed under this subdivision for rent due such person's predecessor in 21 interest if such person has a right thereto. Where a tenant dies during 22 the term of the lease and rent due has not been paid and the apartment 23 is occupied by a person with a claim to possession, a proceeding may be 24 commenced naming the occupants of the apartment seeking a possessory 25 judgment only as against the estate. Entry of such a judgment shall be 26 without prejudice to the possessory claims of the occupants, and any 27 warrant issued shall not be effective as against the occupants. 28 § 1-a. Subdivision 2 of section 711 of the real property actions and 29 proceedings law, as amended by section 12 of part M of chapter 36 of the 30 laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 31 2. (a) The tenant has defaulted in the payment of rent, pursuant to 32 the agreement under which the premises are held, and a written demand of 33 the rent has been made with at least fourteen days' notice requiring, in 34 the alternative, the payment of the rent, or the possession of the prem- 35 ises, has been served upon [him] such tenant as prescribed in section 36 seven hundred thirty-five of this article, and at the time of commence- 37 ment of the proceeding there are no violations of record of any applica- 38 ble state, city or local codes relating to housing maintenance, safety 39 or housing standards pertaining to the subject premises or in the common 40 areas of the subject building, nor any conditions that otherwise contra- 41 vene section two hundred thirty-five-b of the real property law in the 42 subject premises or in the common areas of the subject building, nor any 43 tenant declaration of housing conditions declaring conditions that 44 contravene section two hundred thirty-five-b of the real property law or 45 that violate any applicable state, city or local codes relating to hous- 46 ing maintenance, safety or housing standards in the subject premises or 47 in the common areas of the subject building that are hazardous condi- 48 tions in any building in the landlord's portfolio subject to paragraph 49 (b) of subdivision one of this section herein, nor any conditions that 50 are hazardous conditions of any applicable state, city or local codes 51 relating to housing maintenance, safety or housing standards or hazard- 52 ous violations in any building in the landlord's portfolio. 53 (b) Any person succeeding to the landlord's interest in the premises 54 may proceed under this subdivision for rent due [his] the predecessor in 55 interest if [he] such person has a right thereto. Where a tenant dies 56 during the term of the lease and rent due has not been paid and the A. 1621--A 5 1 apartment is occupied by a person with a claim to possession, a proceed- 2 ing may be commenced naming the occupants of the apartment seeking a 3 possessory judgment only as against the estate. Entry of such a judgment 4 shall be without prejudice to the possessory claims of the occupants, 5 and any warrant issued shall not be effective as against the occupants. 6 (c) Where a tenant declaration of housing conditions has been filed 7 with the landlord and the court that is the lawful venue for a special 8 proceeding under this subdivision, or where there exist any violations 9 of record of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to hous- 10 ing maintenance, safety or housing standards in the subject apartment or 11 in the common areas of the subject building or any hazardous violations 12 of record of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to hous- 13 ing maintenance, safety or housing standards in or pertaining to any 14 building in the landlord's portfolio, a landlord may commence a proceed- 15 ing under this subdivision by filing, with the petition and notice of 16 petition prescribed by section seven hundred thirty-one of this article, 17 an affirmation including facts establishing that the landlord has 18 corrected any purported conditions contained in the tenant declaration 19 of housing conditions, or that the conditions specified in the tenant 20 declaration of housing conditions never existed or that any violations 21 were placed erroneously by a state, city, or local agency, or that a 22 state, city or local agency, authority or department erroneously failed 23 to remove such violations after they were corrected. 24 (d) Failure by the landlord to disclose an existing violation of 25 record of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to housing 26 maintenance, safety or housing standards or any condition that otherwise 27 contravenes section two hundred thirty-five-b of the real property law 28 in the subject premises or in the common areas of the subject building, 29 or hazardous conditions or hazardous violations of record of any appli- 30 cable state, city or local codes relating to housing maintenance, safety 31 or housing standards in any building in the landlord's portfolio subject 32 to paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this section herein, or an exist- 33 ing tenant declaration of housing conditions is grounds for dismissal. 34 If the court finds that the allegations in such a landlord affirmation 35 are untrue regarding the correction or nonexistence of conditions in a 36 tenant declaration of housing conditions or regarding a corrected or 37 erroneously recorded violation of any applicable state, city, or local 38 codes related to housing maintenance, safety, or housing standards and 39 conditions, this is grounds for dismissal. 40 (e) A tenant declaration of housing conditions shall be used by 41 tenants and occupants to provide notification at any time that at least 42 one condition that contravenes section two hundred thirty-five-b of the 43 real property law or any applicable state, city or local codes relating 44 to housing maintenance, safety or housing standards exists in the 45 subject premises or in the common areas of the subject building or that 46 at least one hazardous condition exists in any building in the land- 47 lord's portfolio subject to paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this 48 section herein. A tenant or occupant shall file a signed tenant declara- 49 tion of housing conditions form with the court that is the lawful venue 50 for a proceeding filed pursuant to this article with respect to their 51 dwelling, and shall also provide a copy of the filing to their landlord 52 at the address designated on their multiple dwelling registration. 53 § 2. Section 741 of the real property actions and proceedings law is 54 amended by adding a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 55 3-a. State in the landlord affirmation that at the time of commence- 56 ment of the proceeding that there are no violations of record of any A. 1621--A 6 1 applicable state, city or local codes relating to housing maintenance, 2 safety or housing standards in the subject premises or common areas of 3 the building nor any tenant declaration of housing conditions declaring 4 conditions that contravene section two hundred thirty-five-b of the real 5 property law in the subject premises or in the common areas of the 6 subject building or hazardous conditions as such term is defined in 7 paragraph (d) of subdivision one of section seven hundred eleven of this 8 article in or pertaining to any building in the landlord's portfolio as 9 such term is defined in paragraph (d) of subdivision one of section 10 seven hundred eleven of this article subject to paragraph (b) of subdi- 11 vision one of section seven hundred eleven of this article herein, nor 12 any hazardous conditions as such term is defined in paragraph (d) of 13 subdivision one of section seven hundred eleven of this article or 14 hazardous violations of record of any applicable state, city or local 15 codes relating to housing maintenance, safety or housing standards in or 16 pertaining to any building in the landlord's portfolio as such term is 17 defined in paragraph (d) of subdivision one of section seven hundred 18 eleven of this article. 19 § 3. The real property action and proceedings law is amended by adding 20 a new section 752 to read as follows: 21 § 752. Stay of proceeding or action for nonpayment and holdover cases 22 upon a finding of existing violations. 1. Upon court discovery of any 23 new violations of record of any applicable state, city or local codes 24 relating to housing maintenance, safety or housing standards in the 25 subject apartment or in the common areas of the subject building, or any 26 hazardous conditions as defined by paragraph (d) of subdivision one of 27 section seven hundred eleven of this article or hazardous violations of 28 record of any applicable state, city or local codes relating to housing 29 maintenance, safety or housing standards in any building in the land- 30 lord's portfolio as defined by paragraph (d) of subdivision one of 31 section seven hundred eleven of this article arising after the commence- 32 ment of the proceeding a stay shall be granted and remain in effect only 33 until the condition or violation is corrected consistent with what is 34 required by law. 35 2. Upon court receipt of any new tenant declaration of housing condi- 36 tions filed at any time thereafter the commencement of the proceeding, a 37 stay shall be granted and remain in effect only until the condition is 38 corrected consistent with what is required by law. 39 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 40 the amendments to subdivision 2 of section 711 of the real property 41 actions and proceedings law made by section one of this act shall be 42 subject to the expiration and reversion of such subdivision pursuant to 43 section 7 of part HH of chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, as amended, when 44 upon such date the provisions of section one-a of this act shall take 45 effect.